District of Columbia statutes.
29-408.07

Restated articles of incorporation.

(a)

The board of directors of a nonprofit corporation may restate its articles of incorporation at any time, without approval by the members or any other person, to consolidate all amendments into a single document without substantive change.

(b)

If restated articles of a membership corporation include one or more new amendments that require member approval, the amendments shall be adopted and approved as provided in §§ 29-408.03 and 29-408.04.

(c)

A nonprofit corporation that restates its articles of incorporation shall deliver to the Mayor for filing articles of amendment under § 29-408.06 which include a statement that the articles of amendment are a restatement that consolidates all amendments into a single record.

(d)

Duly adopted restated articles of incorporation shall supersede the original articles of incorporation and all amendments thereto.

(e)

The Mayor shall certify restated articles of incorporation as the articles of incorporation currently in effect.

History

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720

Section References

This section is referenced in § 29-408.03.